Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.074

Refund of fees or other payments collected by state—Warrant.

Payment of such refunds shall be by warrant issued by the state treasurer against the fund in the state treasury to which the erroneous or excessive payment was credited or from any other appropriation made for such refund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.074. Prior: 1955 c 224 s 3.]

NOTES:

Appropriation, when not required for refunds: RCW 43.88.180.